North Dakota statutes. TITLE 44 Offices and Officers
CHAPTER 44-04 Duties, Records, and Meetings
44-04-18.22.
Medical condition or medical treatment information obtained during emergency medical response — Exempt.

The medical condition of an individual, medical treatment provided to an individual, and the name of an individual who received medical treatment from a public entity during an emergency medical response is an exempt record.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 332, § 5.

44-04-18.23.
Library, archive, and museum collections — Exempt records.

A public library, archive, or museum may designate a donated record as an exempt record if the donor of the record requests as a condition of the donation that the record not be released to the public for a specific amount of time, which may not exceed twenty years beyond the death of the donor.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 333, § 1.

44-04-18.24.
Legislative bill tracking records — Exempt.

Any record maintained within a legislative bill tracking system administered or operated by a public entity is an exempt record.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 339, § 1.

44-04-18.25.
Value of property paid or delivered to the administrator of the state abandoned property office — Exempt record.

A record of the value of property paid or delivered to the administrator of the state abandoned property office under section 47-30.2-21 is an exempt record.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 13, § 5, effective April 30, 2015; 2021, ch. 337, § 15, effective July 1, 2021.

44-04-18.26.
Requests for records by members of the legislative assembly and the legislative council.

Notwithstanding section 44-04-18.6, any record of the legislative council relating to a request for public records made by the legislative council on behalf of a member of the legislative assembly is a public record. The legislative council shall maintain a written or digital record of any request for public records made on behalf of a member of the legislative assembly which identifies the member of the legislative assembly who made the request.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 49, § 25, effective July 1, 2015.

44-04-18.27.
Applications for public employment — Hiring process — Confidential records and open records.

If a public entity or any person delegated authority by a public entity to review applications or make hiring decisions receives applications from three or more applicants who meet the minimum qualifications for a vacant position, the public entity or other person shall designate three or more of the qualified applicants as finalists for further consideration before the public entity or other person may issue an offer of employment to fill the position. However, if the public entity or other person does not wish to consider any of the applications further and decides not to make an offer of employment for the vacant position, the public entity need not designate any finalist. The applications and any records related to the applications which contain information that could reasonably be used to identify an applicant are exempt. Once the finalists are designated, the applications and related records of the finalists are open to the public. The public entity or other person reviewing applications on behalf of the public entity shall comply with all requirements for an executive session to discuss exempt applications. If, by the close of the application period for a vacant position, a public entity receives applications from fewer than three applicants who meet the minimum qualifications, the applications and records related to the applications are open to the public. A public entity may adopt policies regarding the release of exempt records under this section.

History.

S.L. 2017, ch. 311, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 328, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

44-04-18.28.
Title IX records at state universities and colleges exempt.

Any record related to a complaint or investigation under title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972 [Pub. L. 92-318; 20 U.S.C. 1681 et seq.] at an institution under the control of the state board of higher education which contains personally identifiable information about a party to the complaint is an exempt record. For purposes of this section, “personally identifiable information” means information that directly identifies an individual, and information that, alone or in combination with other information, is linked or linkable to an individual and would allow a reasonable person who lacks knowledge of the relevant circumstances to identify the individual.

History.

S.L. 2017, ch. 312, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.

44-04-18.29.
Information received for audits by the board of university and school lands.

A record received by the board of university and school lands from a private entity for purposes of the board’s audit of the entity’s coal, oil, gas, or other royalty payments to the board is confidential. However, the board may furnish information to the attorney general, other state agencies, a prosecuting official requiring the information for use in the prosecuting official’s official duties, or for legislative investigations under chapter 54 - 03.2. Confidential information furnished by the board to any third party under this section remains confidential while in the possession of the third party. Confidential information received by the board from any third party under this section remains confidential while in the possession of the board.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 372, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

44-04-18.30.
Identity of reporter to social services agency — Exempt records. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

For purposes of this section:

“Human services” means services provided to an individual or an individual’s family in need of services to assist the individual or the individual’s family in achieving and maintaining basic self-sufficiency, including physical health, mental health, education, welfare, food and nutrition, and housing; and

“Public social services agency” means a state, county, or local public agency that provides human services, and includes regional human service centers, county social services boards, multicounty social services districts, and the department of human services.

The name, address, telephone number, electronic mail address, or other record that reasonably could be used to identify an individual who provided information to a public social service agency is an exempt record if:

The information relates to a matter involving human services over which the agency has regulatory jurisdiction; and

The agency determines the individual had a good-faith belief the information related to a possible violation of law when the individual provided it to the agency.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 373, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

44-04-18.30.
Identity of reporter to social services agency — Exempt records. [Effective September 1, 2022]

For purposes of this section:

“Human services” means services provided to an individual or an individual’s family in need of services to assist the individual or the individual’s family in achieving and maintaining basic self-sufficiency, including physical health, mental health, education, welfare, food and nutrition, and housing; and

“Public social services agency” means a state, county, or local public agency that provides human services, and includes regional human service centers, county social services boards, multicounty social services districts, and the department of health and human services.

The name, address, telephone number, electronic mail address, or other record that reasonably could be used to identify an individual who provided information to a public social service agency is an exempt record if:

The information relates to a matter involving human services over which the agency has regulatory jurisdiction; and

The agency determines the individual had a good-faith belief the information related to a possible violation of law when the individual provided it to the agency.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 373, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 352, § 375, effective September 1, 2022.

44-04-18.31.
Background interviews for law enforcement officer applications — Exempt records.

Any record revealing the substance of, or the individual interviewed in, a background interview conducted as part of the consideration of an applicant for a position as a law enforcement officer is an exempt record. For purposes of this section, “background interview” means an interview with an individual, other than the applicant for a law enforcement officer position, which relates to the fitness, character, behavior, or other qualifications of the applicant.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 374, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

44-04-18.32.
Medical records or medical information — Exempt.

Unless otherwise provided by law, a medical record or a record containing medical information in the possession of a public entity is an exempt record.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 328, § 7, effective August 1, 2021.

44-04-19.
Access to public meetings.

Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, all meetings of a public entity must be open to the public. That portion of a meeting of the governing body of a public entity as defined in subdivision c of subsection 13 of section 44-04-17.1 which does not regard public business is not required to be open under this section.

This section is violated when any person is denied access to a meeting under this section, unless such refusal, implicitly or explicitly communicated, is due to a lack of physical space in the meeting room for the persons seeking access or lack of electronic capacity to allow public viewing of the meeting through electronic means.

For purposes of this section, if the meeting is held in person, the meeting room must be accessible to, and the size of the room must accommodate, the number of persons reasonably expected to attend the meeting. If the meeting is held by electronic means, the electronic capacity must accommodate the number of persons reasonably expected to attend the meeting remotely.

The right of a person to attend a meeting under this section includes the right to photograph, to record on audiotape or videotape and to broadcast live on radio or television the portion of the meeting that is not held in executive session, provided there is no active interference with the conduct of the meeting. The exercise of this right may not be dependent upon the prior approval of the governing body. However, the governing body may impose reasonable limitations on recording activity to minimize the possibility of disruption of the meeting.

For meetings subject to this section, if the meeting is held through any electronic means, the information necessary to join or view the meeting electronically must be included in the notice issued under section 44-04-20.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 306, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 44-0419; S.L. 1977, ch. 417, § 1; 1997, ch. 381, § 13; 2021, ch. 328, § 3, effective August 1, 2021.

Cross-References.

For applicability of provision for access to legislative records and information, see N.D.C.C. § 44-04-18.6.

Open meetings of public and governmental bodies, see N.D. Const., Art. XI, § 5.

Certain economic development records exempt, see N.D.C.C. § 44-04-18.4.

44-04-19.1.
Open records and open meetings — Exemptions for attorney work product, attorney consultation, and negotiation preparation.

Attorney work product is exempt from section 44-04-18. Attorney work product and copies thereof shall not be open to public inspection, examination, or copying unless specifically made public by the public entity receiving such work product.

Attorney consultation is exempt from section 44-04-19. That portion of a meeting of a governing body during which an attorney consultation occurs may be closed by the governing body under section 44-04-19.2.

Active investigatory work product is exempt from section 44-04-18.

“Adversarial administrative proceedings” include only those administrative proceedings in which the administrative agency or institution of higher education acts as a complainant, respondent, or decisionmaker in an adverse administrative proceeding. This term does not refer to those instances in which the administrative agency or institution acts in its own rulemaking capacity.

“Attorney consultation” means any discussion between a governing body and its attorney in instances in which the governing body seeks or receives the attorney’s advice regarding and in anticipation of reasonably predictable or pending civil or criminal litigation or adversarial administrative proceedings or to receive its attorney’s advice and guidance on the legal risks, strengths, and weaknesses of an action of a public entity which, if held in public, would have an adverse fiscal effect on the entity. All other discussions beyond the attorney’s advice and guidance must be made in the open, unless otherwise provided by law. Mere presence or participation of an attorney at a meeting is not sufficient to constitute attorney consultation.

“Attorney work product” means any document or record that:

Was prepared by an attorney representing a public entity or prepared at such an attorney’s express direction;

Reflects a mental impression, conclusion, litigation strategy, or legal theory of that attorney or the entity; and

Was prepared exclusively for civil or criminal litigation, for adversarial administrative proceedings, in anticipation of reasonably predictable civil or criminal litigation or adversarial administrative proceedings, or for guidance on the legal risks, strengths, and weaknesses of an action of a public entity.

“Investigatory work product” means records obtained, compiled, or prepared by a public entity in an effort to monitor and enforce compliance with the law or an order. Investigatory work product must be considered active as long as it is related to monitoring and enforcement activity conducted with a reasonable good-faith belief that it will lead to enforcement of the law or an order the public entity is charged by statute or other law with monitoring and enforcing.

Following the final completion of the civil or criminal litigation or the adversarial administrative proceeding, including the exhaustion of all appellate remedies, attorney work product must be made available for public disclosure by the public entity, unless another exception to section 44-04-18 applies or if disclosure would have an adverse fiscal effect on the conduct or settlement of other pending or reasonably predictable civil or criminal litigation or adversarial administrative proceedings, or the attorney work product reflects mental impressions, opinions, conclusions, or legal theories regarding potential liability of a public entity.

A governing body may hold an executive session under section 44-04-19.2 to discuss negotiating strategy or provide negotiating instructions to its attorney or other negotiator regarding a pending claim, litigation, adversarial administrative proceedings, or contracts, which are currently being negotiated or for which negotiation is reasonably likely to occur in the immediate future. An executive session may be held under this subsection only when an open meeting would have an adverse fiscal effect on the bargaining or litigating position of the public entity. A record revealing negotiation strategy or instruction under this section is exempt. Drafts of contracts or agreements subject to negotiations are exempt but only for so long as release would have an adverse fiscal effect on the public entity, unless the records are otherwise exempt or confidential.

Nothing in this section may be construed to waive any attorney-client privilege of a public entity as defined in subdivision c of subsection 13 of section 44-04-17.1 regarding matters that do not pertain to public business.

A settlement agreement between a public entity and another party is exempt from disclosure until it has been fully executed and accepted by all concerned parties unless the records are otherwise exempt or confidential. In the case of multiple settlement agreements involving multiple parties involved in the same incident or undertaking, a settlement agreement is exempt until settlement agreements have been fully executed by all concerned parties unless the records are otherwise exempt or confidential.

Unless subject to subsection 6 of section 44-04-18, active litigation records are exempt from section 44-04-18. For purposes of this subsection, “active litigation records” means records obtained, compiled, or prepared by a public entity or the attorney representing a public entity for the purpose of litigation unless the records already have been filed publicly or the litigation is completed.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 545, § 1; 1991, ch. 476, § 1; 1993, ch. 45, § 17; 1995, ch. 329, § 12; 1997, ch. 381, § 15; 2001, ch. 393, § 9; 2005, ch. 15, § 38; 2005, ch. 377, § 9; 2015, ch. 310, § 4, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 308, §§ 10, 11, effective April 12, 2017; 2021, ch. 328, § 4, effective August 1, 2021.

44-04-19.2.
Confidential or closed meetings.

A governing body may hold an executive session to consider or discuss closed or confidential records.

Unless a different procedure is provided by law, an executive session that is authorized by law may be held if:

The governing body first convenes in an open session and, unless a confidential meeting is required, passes a motion to hold an executive session;

The governing body announces during the open portion of the meeting the topics to be discussed or considered during the executive session and the body’s legal authority for holding an executive session on those topics;

The executive session is recorded under subsection 5;

The topics discussed or considered during the executive session are limited to those for which an executive session is authorized by law and that have been previously announced under this subsection; and

Final action concerning the topics discussed or considered during the executive session is taken at a meeting open to the public, unless final action is otherwise required by law to be taken during a closed or confidential meeting. For purposes of this subsection, “final action” means a collective decision or a collective commitment or promise to make a decision on any matter, including formation of a position or policy, but does not include guidance given by members of the governing body to legal counsel or other negotiator in a closed attorney consultation or negotiation preparation session authorized in section 44-04-19.1.

The remainder of a meeting during which an executive session is held is an open meeting unless a specific exemption is otherwise applicable.

The minutes of an open meeting during which an executive session is held must indicate the names of the members attending the executive session, the date and time the executive session was called to order and adjourned, a summary of the general topics that were discussed or considered that does not disclose any closed or confidential information, and the legal authority for holding the executive session.

All meetings of the governing body of a public entity that are not open to the public must be recorded electronically or on audiotape or videotape. The recording must be disclosed pursuant to court order under subsection 2 of section 44-04-18.11 or to the attorney general for the purpose of administrative review under section 44-04-21.1. The attorney general may not disclose to the public any recording received under this subsection and must return the recording to the governing body upon completion of the administrative review. The recording may be disclosed upon majority vote of the governing body unless the executive session was required to be confidential. Disclosure of the recording by a public servant except as provided in this subsection is a violation of section 12.1-13-01. All recordings under this subsection must be retained for a minimum of six months after the executive session that is the subject of the recording.

A public entity may sequester all competitors in a competitive selection or hiring process from that portion of a public meeting wherein presentations are heard or interviews are conducted.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 381, § 14; 2001, ch. 393, § 10; 2005, ch. 15, § 38; 2005, ch. 377, § 10.

44-04-19.3.
Open meetings exemption — Legislative caucuses.

A caucus of members of either house of the legislative assembly may meet in an executive session that is not subject to section 44-04-19.2 if the meeting is not held on public property.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 381, § 16.

44-04-20.
Notice of public meetings required — Exceptions — Schedule set by statute, ordinance, or resolution.

Unless otherwise provided by law, public notice must be given in advance of all meetings of a public entity as defined in section 44-04-17.1, including executive sessions and meetings held remotely. Unless otherwise specified by law, resolution, or ordinance, or as decided by the public entity, notices required by this section need not be published.

The notice required in this section must contain the date, time, and location of the meeting and, if practicable, the topics to be considered. However, the lack of an agenda in the notice, or a departure from, or an addition to, the agenda at a meeting, does not affect the validity of the meeting or the actions taken thereat. The notice also must contain the general subject matter of any executive session expected to be held during the meeting. For meetings to be held by electronic means, the location of the meeting is the electronic address and any other information necessary to allow the public to join or view the electronic meeting as required under section 44-04-19.

If the governing body holds regularly scheduled meetings, the schedule of these meetings, including the aforementioned notice information, if available, must be filed annually with the secretary of state for state-level bodies or for public entities defined in subdivision c of subsection 13 of section 44-04-17.1, the city auditor or designee of the city for city-level bodies, and the county auditor or designee of the county for all other bodies or the schedule must be posted on the public entity’s website. This schedule must be furnished to anyone who requests the information. When reasonable and practicable, a governing body of a public entity should attempt to set a regular schedule for its meetings by statute, ordinance, or resolution. This subsection does not apply to meetings of the legislative assembly or any committee thereof. Filing a yearly schedule of upcoming meetings does not relieve a public entity from its obligation to post an agenda for each meeting as required in subsections 2 and 4.

The notice required in this section must be posted at the principal office of the governing body holding the meeting, if such exists, and at the location of the meeting on the day of the meeting. In addition, unless all the information contained in the notice was previously filed with the appropriate office under subsection 3, the notice must be filed in the office of the secretary of state for state-level bodies or for public entities defined in subdivision c of subsection 13 of section 44-04-17.1, the city auditor or designee of the city for city-level bodies, the county auditor or designee of the county for all other bodies, or posted on the public entity’s website. This subsection does not apply to meetings of the legislative assembly or any committee thereof.

The governing body’s presiding officer has the responsibility of assuring that public notice of a meeting’s date, time, and location, is given at the same time as such governing body’s members are notified, and that this notice is available to anyone requesting such information. As soon as an agenda is prepared for a meeting with the information required in subsection 2 and given to members of the governing body, the agenda must be posted at the locations as required by subsection 4 and given to anyone requesting the information. When a request is made for notice of meetings, the request is effective for one year unless a different time period is specified.

In the event of emergency or special meetings of a governing body, the person calling such a meeting shall, in addition to the notices in subsection 4, also notify the public entity’s official newspaper, if any, and any representatives of the news media which have requested to be so notified of such special or emergency meetings, of the time, place, date, and topics to be considered at the same time as such governing body’s members are notified. If the public entity does not have an official newspaper, then it must notify the official newspaper of the county where its principal office or mailing address is located. Topics that may be considered at an emergency or special meeting are limited to those included in the notice.

A committee of an institution under the authority of the state board of higher education, in lieu of the notice requirements in this section, may file in the office of the president of the institution the name, address, and telephone number of a person who may be contacted to obtain specific times, dates, and locations of any meetings of that committee or to request specific notification of each meeting of that committee.

The attorney general shall prepare general guidelines to assist public entities in following the provisions of this section.

This section is violated when a notice is not provided in substantial compliance with this section.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 477, § 1; 1983, ch. 493, § 1; 1987, ch. 539, § 1; 1991, ch. 477, § 1; 1997, ch. 381, § 17; 2003, ch. 382, § 12; 2005, ch. 15, § 38; 2005, ch. 377, § 11; 2011, ch. 332, § 9; 2017, ch. 308, § 12, effective April 12, 2017; 2021, ch. 328, § 5, effective August 1, 2021.

44-04-21.
Open voting at public meetings required — Results recorded in minutes.

Unless otherwise specifically provided by law, all votes of whatever kind taken at any public meeting governed by the provisions of section 44-04-19 must be open, public votes, and all nonprocedural votes must be recorded roll call votes, with the votes of each member being made public at the open meeting. Procedural votes must be recorded roll call votes upon the request of any member of a governing body holding a meeting subject to this section. As used in this section, “nonprocedural” should be broadly interpreted and includes all votes that pertain to the merits of the matter before the governing body.

Minutes must be kept of all open meetings and are records subject to section 44-04-18. The minutes must include, at a minimum:

The names of the members attending the meeting;

The date and time the meeting was called to order and adjourned;

A list of topics discussed regarding public business;

A description of each motion made at the meeting and whether the motion was seconded;

The results of every vote taken at the meeting; and

The vote of each member on every recorded roll call vote.

Notwithstanding subsection 8 of section 44-04-18, the disclosure of minutes kept under this subsection may not be conditioned on the approval of the minutes by the governing body.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 478, § 1; 1997, ch. 381, § 18.

44-04-21.1.
Administrative review procedure.

Any interested person may request an attorney general’s opinion to review a written denial of a request for records under section 44-04-18, a denial of access to a meeting under section 44-04-19, or other alleged violation of section 44-04-18, 44-04-19, 44-04-19.2, 44-04-20, or 44-04-21 by any public entity other than the legislative assembly or any committee thereof. A request made under this section must be made within thirty days of the alleged violation, except that a request based on allegations that a meeting occurred without the notice required by section 44-04-20, must be made within ninety days of the alleged violation. In preparing an opinion under this section, the attorney general has discretion to obtain and review a recording made under section 44-04-19.2. The attorney general may request and obtain information claimed to be exempt or confidential for the purpose of determining whether the information is exempt or confidential. Any such information may not be released by the attorney general and may be returned to the provider of the information. The attorney general shall issue to the public entity involved an opinion on the alleged violation, which may be a summary opinion, unless the request is withdrawn by the person requesting the opinion or a civil action has been filed involving the possible violation. If the request pertains to a public entity as defined in subdivision c of subsection 13 of section 44-04-17.1, the opinion must be issued to the public entity providing the public funds. In any opinion issued under this section, the attorney general shall base the opinion on the facts given by the public entity.

If the attorney general issues a written opinion concluding that a violation has occurred, the public entity has seven days after the opinion is issued, regardless of whether a civil action is filed under section 44-04-21.2, to disclose the record, to issue a notice of a meeting that will be held within a reasonable time to correct the violation, or to take steps to correct any other violation. If the public entity fails to take the required action within the seven-day period and the person requesting the opinion prevails in a civil action brought under section 44-04-21.2, the person must be awarded costs, disbursements, and reasonable attorney’s fees in the action and on appeal. The attorney general may require officials of the public entity at issue in the opinion to obtain mandatory training by a certain date. The consequences for failing to comply with an attorney general’s opinion issued under this section will be the same as for other attorney general’s opinions, including potential personal liability for the person or persons responsible for the noncompliance.

If a state-level public entity as defined in subdivision a of subsection 13 of section 44-04-17.1 does not comply in full with the attorney general’s opinion, and a civil action is brought under section 44-04-21.2 or is reasonably predictable, the entity, at its sole cost and expense, shall retain separate counsel who has been approved and appointed by the attorney general as a special assistant attorney general to represent the entity in that action.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 381, § 19; 2003, ch. 382, § 13; 2005, ch. 15, §
38; 2005, ch. 377, § 12; 2017, ch. 308, § 13, effective April 12, 2017.

44-04-21.2.
Remedies for violations and enforcement procedure.

A violation of section 44-04-18, 44-04-19, 44-04-19.2, 44-04-20, or 44-04-21 may be the subject of a civil action brought by an interested person or entity. For an alleged violation of section 44-04-18, the complaint must be accompanied by a dated, written request for the requested record. If a court finds that any of these sections have been violated by a public entity, the court may award declaratory relief, an injunction, a writ of prohibition or mandamus, costs, disbursements, and reasonable attorney’s fees against the entity. For an intentional or knowing violation of section 44-04-18, 44-04-19, 44-04-19.2, 44-04-20, or 44-04-21, the court may also award damages in an amount equal to one thousand dollars or actual damages caused by the violation, whichever is greater. An action under this subsection must be commenced within sixty days of the date the person knew or should have known of the violation or within thirty days of issuance of an attorney general’s opinion on the alleged violation, whichever is later. Venue for an action is in the county where the entity has its principal office or, if the entity does not have a principal office within the state, in Burleigh County.

Any action that is a product of a violation of section 44-04-19, 44-04-20, or 44-04-21 is voidable by a court in a civil action authorized by this section.

The remedies provided in this section are not available if a violation of section 44-04-18, 44-04-19, 44-04-19.2, 44-04-20, or 44-04-21 has been corrected before a civil action is filed and no person has been prejudiced or harmed by the delay. An interested person or entity may not file a civil action under this section seeking attorney’s fees or damages, or both, until at least three working days after providing notice of the alleged violation to the chief administrative officer for the public entity. This subsection does not apply if the attorney general has found under section 44-04-21.1, on a prior occasion, that the public entity has violated section 44-04-18, 44-04-19, 44-04-19.2, 44-04-20, or 44-04-21.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 381, § 20; 2001, ch. 393, § 11.

44-04-21.3.
Attorney general referral and criminal penalties.

The attorney general may refer to the appropriate state’s attorney any public servant as defined in section 12.1-01-04 who has been found in more than one opinion issued pursuant to section 44-04-21.1 to have violated section 44-04-18, 44-04-19, 44-04-19.2, 44-04-20, or 44-04-21. A public servant as defined in section 12.1-01-04 who knowingly violates section 44-04-18, 44-04-19, 44-04-19.2, 44-04-20, or 44-04-21 is guilty of an offense under section 12.1-11-06.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 393, § 12.

44-04-22.
Conflict of interest law.

A person acting in a legislative or quasi-legislative or judicial or quasi-judicial capacity for a political subdivision of the state who has a direct and substantial personal or pecuniary interest in a matter before that board, council, commission, or other body, must disclose the fact to the body of which that person is a member, and may not participate in or vote on that particular matter without the consent of a majority of the rest of the body.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 423, § 1.

44-04-23.
Year 2000 information requests — Use — Exceptions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 125, § 4.

44-04-24.
Security system plan — Disaster and cybersecurity information — Exemption.

A security system plan kept by a public entity, and records regarding disaster mitigation, preparation, response, vulnerability, or recovery, or for cybersecurity planning, mitigation, or threat, are exempt from the provisions of section 44-04-18 and section 6 of article XI of the Constitution of North Dakota.

As used in this section:

“Critical infrastructure” means public buildings, systems, including telecommunications centers and computers, power generation plants, dams, bridges, and similar key resources, and systems related to utility services, fuel supply, energy, hazardous liquid, natural gas, or coal, whether physical or virtual, so vital to the state that the incapacity or destruction of these systems would have a debilitating impact on security, state economic security, state public health or safety, or any combination of those matters.

“Security system plan” includes:

Records, information, photographs, audio and visual presentations, schematic diagrams, surveys, recommendations, communications, or consultations relating directly to the physical or electronic security of a public facility, or any critical infrastructure, whether owned by or leased to the state or any of its political subdivisions, or any privately owned or leased critical infrastructure if the plan or a portion of the plan is in the possession of a public entity;

Information relating to cybersecurity defenses, or threats, attacks, attempted attacks, and vulnerabilities of cyber system operations relating directly to the physical or electronic security of a public facility, or any critical infrastructure, whether owned by or leased to the state or any of its political subdivisions, or any privately owned or leased critical infrastructure if the information is in the possession of a public entity;

Threat assessments;

Vulnerability and capability assessments conducted by a public entity, or any private entity;

Threat response plans; and

Emergency evacuation plans.

This exemption applies to security system plans received by a public entity before, on, or after March 20, 2003.

Nothing in this section may be construed to limit disclosure required for necessary construction, renovation, or remodeling work on a public building. Disclosure under this subsection does not constitute public disclosure.

Records deemed exempt under this section and disclosed to another entity continue to be exempt in the possession of the receiving entity.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 385, § 1; 2019, ch. 375, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

44-04-25.
Public health and security plans — Exemption.

Any plans and only those portions of the records, information, surveys, communications, and consultations used to produce the plans relating to protection of the public or public officials against threats of violence or other harm are exempt from the provisions of section 44-04-18 and section 6 of article XI of the Constitution of North Dakota.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 385, § 2.

44-04-26.
Security system plan — Public health and security plans — Exemption from public meeting requirements.

Those portions of a meeting which would reveal a security system plan, a public health or security plan, or a portion of any such plan, made exempt by section 44-04-24 or 44-04-25, are exempt from section 44-04-19 and section 5 of article XI of the Constitution of North Dakota.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 385, § 3.

44-04-27.
Computer passwords and security information — Confidential.

Security codes, passwords, combinations, or security-related plans used to protect electronic information or to prevent access to computers, computer systems, or computer or telecommunications networks of a public entity are confidential.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 386, § 1.

44-04-28.
Social security numbers — Confidential.

Social security numbers in the possession of a public entity are confidential. However, social security numbers may be released as authorized in this section or by other state or federal law.

A social security number may be released:

For purposes of participation in retirement or other employment benefits programs;

As authorized by the individual to whom the social security number is assigned, that individual’s lawful agent or guardian, or by order of a court; or

To another public entity or its agents, employees, or contractors if disclosure is necessary for the receiving entity to perform its duties and responsibilities. The receiving governmental entity and its agents, employees, and contractors shall maintain the confidential status of the numbers.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 382, § 9; 2007, ch. 388, § 10.

44-04-29.
Client files at the university of North Dakota school of law — Confidential.

Information in the files of private clients receiving legal services through the clinical education program of the university of North Dakota school of law is confidential unless the information has been requested and is properly obtainable through applicable discovery rules.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 382, § 10.